New York, session 2025-2026, A9660.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "public safety investment act". 3 § 2. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 844 to read 4 as follows: 5 § 844. Law enforcement officer grant funds. 1. Within amounts appro- 6 priated for such purpose, in the years two thousand twenty-seven, two 7 thousand twenty-eight and two thousand twenty-nine, one hundred fifty 8 million dollars shall be available and allocated each year pursuant to 9 subdivisions two and three of this section and shall be paid to cover 10 all expenses related to hiring law enforcement officers, including any 11 benefits provided to such officers through employment with their respec- 12 tive law enforcement agency. 13 2. One hundred twelve million five hundred thousand dollars of the 14 funds allocated pursuant to subdivision one of this section shall be 15 available to law enforcement agencies for the purpose of hiring new 16 police officers or rehiring police officers who have been laid off, 17 hiring members of the armed forces to serve as law enforcement officers 18 in crime prevention, and supporting non-hiring initiatives, such as 19 training law enforcement officers in crime prevention, community polic- 20 ing techniques, and developing technologies that support crime 21 prevention strategies. Eligible law enforcement agencies shall be 22 eligible for up to ninety percent of the costs associated with such 23 hiring or non-hiring initiatives; provided, however that such law 24 enforcement agencies shall commit to employing such officers for at 25 least five years, retaining such officers for at least two additional 26 years after the three years of grant funding expires. 27 3. Thirty-seven million five hundred thousand dollars of the funds 28 allocated pursuant to subdivision one of this section shall be available EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08633-03-6 A. 9660 2 1 to law enforcement agencies for the purchase of equipment, such as 2 firearms, riot gear, and protective vests; provided, however, that such 3 grant funds shall not be expended on the purchase or maintenance of 4 police cruisers or other vehicles used by law enforcement agencies. 5 4. The commissioner, in cooperation with the attorney general and the 6 superintendent of state police, shall establish eligibility criteria and 7 the application process for the grants provided for pursuant to this 8 section. Grant information and application forms shall be made avail- 9 able through the New York state grants gateway. 10 § 3. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 158-a to 11 read as follows: 12 § 158-a. Firefighter grant funds. 1. Within amounts appropriated for 13 such purpose, in the years two thousand twenty-seven, two thousand twen- 14 ty-eight and two thousand twenty-nine, one hundred fifty million dollars 15 shall be available and allocated each year pursuant to subdivisions two 16 and three of this section and shall be paid to cover all expenses 17 related to hiring firefighters, including any benefits provided to such 18 firefighters through employment with their respective fire department. 19 2. One hundred twelve million five hundred thousand dollars of the 20 funds allocated pursuant to subdivision one of this section shall be 21 available to fire departments for the purchase of equipment. 22 3. Thirty-seven million five hundred thousand dollars of the funds 23 allocated pursuant to subdivision one of this section shall be available 24 to fire departments for the purpose of hiring new firefighters or rehir- 25 ing firefighters who have been laid off and supporting non-hiring initi- 26 atives, such as training firefighters in fire prevention and developing 27 technologies that support firefighting strategies. Eligible fire depart- 28 ments shall be eligible for up to ninety percent of the costs associated 29 with such hiring or non-hiring initiatives; provided, however that such 30 fire departments shall commit to employing such firefighters for at 31 least five years, retaining such firefighters for at least two addi- 32 tional years after the three years of grant funding expires. 33 4. The state fire administrator shall establish eligibility criteria 34 and the application process for the grants provided for pursuant to this 35 section. Grant information and application forms shall be made available 36 through the New York state grants gateway. 37 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.